Missouri, session 2026, SB1273.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 160 and 162, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 160.422
and 162.092, to read as follows:
160.422. 1. A political subdivision shall not adopt,
enforce, impose, or administer an ordinance, local policy,
or local resolution that prohibits property sold, leased, or
transferred by the political subdivision from being used for
any lawful educational purpose by a charter school.
2. A political subdivision shall not impose, enforce,
or apply any deed restriction, property use restriction, or
other such restriction that expressly, or by its operation,
prohibits property sold, leased, or transferred by the
political subdivision from being used for any lawful
educational purpose by a charter school. Any deed
restriction, affirmative use deed restriction, property use
restriction, or other such restriction that affirmatively
allows for only one or more specified uses or purposes that
do not include any educational use or purpose is prohibited
under this section. Any deed restriction, affirmative use
deed restriction, property use restriction, or other such

SB 1273 2
restriction in effect on the effective date of this section
that prohibits or does not permit property previously used
for any educational purpose from being used for any future
educational purpose is void.
3. Any ordinance, policy, regulation, deed, use
restriction, or contract made in violation of this section
shall be void from its inception.
4. For purposes of this section, "political
subdivision" shall include, but shall not be limited to,
municipalities, counties, and school districts.
162.092. 1. If a school district extends an offer to
purchase or lease an unused facility to a party other than a
public entity, the contract shall include a provision that
makes the purchase or lease subject to the right of first
refusal by a public entity.
2. If the offer to purchase or lease is accepted, the
school district selling or leasing the unused facility shall
provide a public notice on its website stating:
(1) The unused facility is available for lease or
purchase;
(2) The square footage of the unused facility;
(3) The contact information for the school district
representative in charge of the lease or sale; and
(4) The expiration date of the right of first refusal,
which shall be sixty days after the date of notification.
3. If the offering school district has not received an
offer to purchase or lease an unused facility from a party
other than a public entity, a public entity may initiate,
and the school board of the offering school district shall,
within sixty days of receiving such offer, engage in,
substantive good faith negotiations for the purchase or
lease of the unused facility. The negotiation period shall

SB 1273 3
continue for thirty days, or less if an agreement is
reached. The school district and public entity shall engage
an independent mediator who shall gather independent
appraisals of the value of the property when the public
entity made an offer to purchase. The appraised value shall
determine a fair market price for the offering public
entity. In situations when the public entity made an offer
to lease the property, the appraisals gathered by the
mediator shall determine a fair market lease price for the
offering public entity.
4. If two or more public entities notify the offering
school district indicating an interest in the unused
facility to lease or purchase, the offering school district
shall make the final selection of the purchaser or lessee.
5. In right of first refusal negotiations with a
public entity, it shall be the option of the offering school
district whether to sell or lease the property under
consideration, at fair market value or less, for a term to
be agreed upon by the parties. A lease shall include
ingress to and egress from the facility, and where a part of
a facility is leased, the right to access and use of the
common area shared by all tenants and users of the
facility. If a public entity leases the entire facility,
the public entity may incur debt to make improvements to the
facility, and the school district shall subordinate its
interest in the lease to such debt.
6. The public entity shall have six months after the
date of making a written offer to complete the purchase or
lease of the unused facility for a price negotiated with the
school district.
7. During the term of a lease, the public entity shall
be responsible for direct expenses related to the facility

SB 1273 4
or any part of the facility leased, including utilities,
insurance, maintenance, property taxes, and repairs.
8. If a public entity plans to sell an unused facility
that it has purchased, it shall first offer the facility to
the school district from which it was purchased. Such offer
shall be governed by the procedures set forth in this
section.
9. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Public entity", the state of Missouri; any
political subdivision of the state, including all boards,
commissions, agencies, institutions, authorities, and bodies
politic and corporate of the state created by or in
accordance with state law or regulations; or any institution
supported in whole or in part by public funds;
(2) "School board-approved written plan", a written
plan that is approved by the school board for future use of
an unused school building or facility owned by the school
district and that specifies purposes for which such building
or facility shall be used by the school within two years of
the plan's approval, such as academic purposes,
extracurricular activities, administrative school functions,
or sports;
(3) "Unused facility", a school building or facility
that is owned by a school district and is not used for
academic purposes, extracurricular activities,
administrative school functions, or sports, and for which
either of the following is true:
(a) The school district does not have a school board-
approved written plan for future use of the building or
facility; or
(b) The school district has a school board-approved
written plan for future use of the building or facility, but

SB 1273 5
such plan has not been executed within two years of the
plan's approval.
✓